Utah statutes.
54-7-14.5.    Rescission or amendment of orders or decisions.

(1)  The commission may, at any time after providing an affected utility notice and an opportunity to be heard, rescind, alter, or amend any order or decision made by the commission.

(2)  An order rescinding, altering, or amending an original commission order or decision shall have the same effect on the public utility as the original order or decision.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 2009 General Session

